Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2024 Act are added  to and made a part of ORS
chapter 312.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each  county shall establish
a process by which:
(a) Any surplus of the proceeds from the sale of property deeded to the  county after a
property tax lien foreclosure shall be determined;
(b) Adequate notice of the surplus shall be given to all interested parties;
(c) The right to the surplus shall be determined; and
(d) The surplus shall be deposited in full  in an interest-bearing account until the amount
and the distribution of the surplus have been determined.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  operation of ORS 312.200 shall be
suspended during the period that begins on the effective date of this 2024 Act and ends  on
December 31, 2025.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Department of Revenue shall  coordinate with county tax officers and
interested parties to determine a detailed uniform process by  which the counties shall com-
ply with section 2 of this 2024 Act and the ruling of the United States Supreme Court in Tyler
v. Hennepin County, Minnesota, 598 U.S. 631 (2023).
(2) Not later than  September 15, 2024, the department shall submit a report, in the
manner required under ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
related to revenue, that  sets forth the determinations made pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section. The report shall include recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 4. This 2024 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4056 (HB 4056-A) Page 1
Passed by House March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4056 (HB 4056-A) Page 2